Washington statutes.
RCW 2.36.050

Juries in courts of limited jurisdiction.

In courts of limited jurisdiction, juries shall be selected and impaneled in the same manner as in the superior courts, except that a court of limited jurisdiction shall use the master jury list developed by the superior court to select a jury panel. Jurors for the jury panel may be selected at random from the population of the area served by the court.

[ 1988 c 188 s 3; 1980 c 162 s 6; 1972 ex.s. c 57 s 1; 1891 c 48 s 4; RRS s 92.]

NOTES:

Legislative findings—Severability—Effective date—1988 c 188: See notes following RCW 2.36.010.

Severability—1980 c 162: See note following RCW 3.02.010.

Courts of limited jurisdiction: Chapter 3.02 RCW.